District of Columbia statutes.
38-1903

Teachers in the Americanization schools; custodial staff.

(a)

Officers and teachers in the Americanization, evening, and summer schools may also be officers and teachers in the regular day schools.

(b)

Members of the custodial staff in the evening, summer, and Americanization schools may also be members of the custodial staff in the day schools.

History

July 1, 1943, 57 Stat. 322, ch. 184, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1018.
1973 Ed., § 31-681.